District of Columbia statutes.
25-511

Minimum fee for pool buying group retail importation permit.

The minimum annual license fee for a pool buying group agent importation permit shall be $1,000, in addition to any other license fees prescribed in this title.

Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 401(j), 51 DCR 6525
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 47(d)(2), 53 DCR 6794
D.C. Law 16-191 validated a previously made technical correction.

“Section 401 shall apply upon the effective date of the regulations promulgated under section 402.”

“Sec. 403. Applicability.

“The Mayor shall promulgate proposed rules and regulations to administer this title within 180 days of its effective date. The proposed rules and regulations, as well as any subsequent rules and regulations amending this title, shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess, If the Council does not approve or disapprove the rules and regulations, in whole or in part, by resolution with the 45-day review period, the proposed rules and regulations shall be deemed approved.

“Sec. 402. Rules and regulations.

Sections 402 and 403 of D.C. Law 15-187 provided: